bin/foma/coptic.lexc
LEXICON Root

art_pl_long ;
n ;
prep_m ;
tenprefix ;
hundred ;
nf ;
pet ;
art_m ;
tens ;
penta ;
inf_mark ;
art_f_long ;
na ;
art_pl_l ;
conv ;
prep ;
large_counter ;
art_theta ;
aux_ei ;
art_phi ;
bi_subj ;
circum1 ;
conv_short ;
adv ;
digits ;
tri_aux ;
prep_no_tn ;
et ;
thousand ;
ta ;
verb ;
aux_ei_no_noun ;
art_pl_b ;
m ;
art_pl ;
tri_nom ;
art_eth ;
art_m_long ;
art_f ;
je ;
art_pl_r ;

LEXICON art_eth

ⲉⲑ:ⲉⲧ h_verb;
ⲛⲉⲑ:ⲛⲉⲧ h_verb;
ⲡⲉⲑ:ⲡⲉⲧ h_verb;
ⲧⲉⲑ:ⲧⲉⲧ h_verb;

LEXICON art_f

ⲟⲩ noun_f;
ⲟⲩⲕⲉ noun_f;
ⲧ noun_f;
ⲧϥ:ⲧⲉϥ noun_f;
ⲧⲁ noun_f;
ⲧⲉϥ noun_f;
ⲧⲉⲉⲓ:ⲧⲉⲓ noun_f;
ⲧⲉⲓ noun_f;
ⲧⲉⲕ noun_f;
ⲧⲉⲛ noun_f;
ⲧⲉⲥ noun_f;
ⲧⲉⲧⲛ noun_f;
ⲧⲉⲩ noun_f;
ⲧⲕ:ⲧⲉⲕ noun_f;
ⲧⲕⲉ noun_f;
ⲧⲛ:ⲧⲉⲛ noun_f;
ⲧⲟⲩ noun_f;

LEXICON art_f_long

ⲧⲉ clust_n_f;

LEXICON art_f_no_tn

ⲟⲩ noun_f;
ⲟⲩⲕⲉ noun_f;
ⲧ noun_f;
ⲧϥ:ⲧⲉϥ noun_f;
ⲧⲁ noun_f;
ⲧⲉϥ noun_f;
ⲧⲉⲉⲓ:ⲧⲉⲓ noun_f;
ⲧⲉⲓ noun_f;
ⲧⲉⲕ noun_f;
ⲧⲉⲛ noun_f;
ⲧⲉⲥ noun_f;
ⲧⲉⲧⲛ noun_f;
ⲧⲉⲩ noun_f;
ⲧⲕ:ⲧⲉⲕ noun_f;
ⲧⲕⲉ noun_f;
ⲧⲛ:ⲧⲉⲛ noun_f;
ⲧⲟⲩ noun_f;

LEXICON art_m

ⲟⲩ noun_m;
ⲟⲩⲕⲉ noun_m;
ⲡ noun_m;
ⲡϥ:ⲡⲉϥ noun_m;
ⲡⲁ noun_m;
ⲡⲉϥ noun_m;
ⲡⲉⲉⲓ:ⲡⲉⲓ noun_m;
ⲡⲉⲓ noun_m;
ⲡⲉⲕ noun_m;
ⲡⲉⲛ noun_m;
ⲡⲉⲥ noun_m;
ⲡⲉⲧⲛ noun_m;
ⲡⲉⲩ noun_m;
ⲡⲕ:ⲡⲉⲕ noun_m;
ⲡⲕⲉ noun_m;
ⲡⲛ:ⲡⲉⲛ noun_m;
ⲡⲟⲩ noun_m;

LEXICON art_m_long

ⲡⲉ clust_n_m;

LEXICON art_phi

ⲫ:ⲡ h_noun_m;

LEXICON art_pl

ϩⲉⲛ noun_f;
ϩⲉⲛⲕⲉ noun_f;
ⲛ noun_f;
ⲛⲁ noun_f;
ⲛⲉϥ noun_f;
ⲛⲉⲉⲓ:ⲛⲉⲓ noun_f;
ⲛⲉⲓ noun_f;
ⲛⲉⲕ noun_f;
ⲛⲉⲛ noun_f;
ⲛⲉⲥ noun_f;
ⲛⲉⲧⲛ noun_f;
ⲛⲉⲩ noun_f;
ⲛⲕ:ⲛⲉⲕ noun_f;
ⲛⲕⲉ noun_f;
ⲛⲟⲩ noun_f;
ϩⲉⲛ noun_pl;
ϩⲉⲛⲕⲉ noun_pl;
ⲛ noun_pl;
ⲛⲁ noun_pl;
ⲛⲉϥ noun_pl;
ⲛⲉⲉⲓ:ⲛⲉⲓ noun_pl;
ⲛⲉⲓ noun_pl;
ⲛⲉⲕ noun_pl;
ⲛⲉⲛ noun_pl;
ⲛⲉⲥ noun_pl;
ⲛⲉⲧⲛ noun_pl;
ⲛⲉⲩ noun_pl;
ⲛⲕ:ⲛⲉⲕ noun_pl;
ⲛⲕⲉ noun_pl;
ⲛⲟⲩ noun_pl;
ϩⲉⲛ noun_m;
ϩⲉⲛⲕⲉ noun_m;
ⲛ noun_m;
ⲛⲁ noun_m;
ⲛⲉϥ noun_m;
ⲛⲉⲉⲓ:ⲛⲉⲓ noun_m;
ⲛⲉⲓ noun_m;
ⲛⲉⲕ noun_m;
ⲛⲉⲛ noun_m;
ⲛⲉⲥ noun_m;
ⲛⲉⲧⲛ noun_m;
ⲛⲉⲩ noun_m;
ⲛⲕ:ⲛⲉⲕ noun_m;
ⲛⲕⲉ noun_m;
ⲛⲟⲩ noun_m;

LEXICON art_pl_b

ⲃ:ⲛ noun_b;

LEXICON art_pl_l

ⲗ:ⲛ noun_l;

LEXICON art_pl_long

ⲛⲉ clust_n_m;
ⲛⲉ clust_n_f;

LEXICON art_pl_r

ⲣ:ⲛ noun_r;

LEXICON art_theta

ⲑ:ⲧ h_noun_f;

LEXICON aux_ei

ϣⲁⲛϯ:ϣⲁⲛⲧⲓ verb;
ⲙⲡⲁϯ:ⲙⲡⲁⲧⲓ verb;
ⲙⲡⲁⲧⲉⲓ:ⲙⲡⲁⲧⲓ verb;
ⲛⲧⲉⲣⲉⲓ:ⲛⲧⲉⲣⲓ verb;

LEXICON aux_ei_no_noun

ⲉⲧⲉⲓ:ⲉⲧⲓ stative;
ⲙⲡⲉⲓ:ⲙⲡⲓ stative;
ⲉⲧⲉⲓ:ⲉⲧⲓ v_not_n;
ⲙⲡⲉⲓ:ⲙⲡⲓ v_not_n;

LEXICON bi_subj

ϥ verb;
ϯ verb;
ⲕ verb;
ⲛⲧⲁ verb;
ⲛⲧⲉⲣⲉⲓ:ⲛⲧⲉⲣⲓ verb;
ⲡⲉϯ:ⲡⲉⲧⲓ verb;
ⲥ verb;
ⲥⲉ verb;
ⲧⲁ verb;
ⲧⲉ verb;
ⲧⲉⲧⲉⲓ:ⲧⲉⲧⲓ verb;
ⲧⲉⲧⲛ verb;
ⲧⲛ verb;
ϥ stative;
ϯ stative;
ⲕ stative;
ⲛⲧⲁ stative;
ⲛⲧⲉⲣⲉⲓ:ⲛⲧⲉⲣⲓ stative;
ⲡⲉϯ:ⲡⲉⲧⲓ stative;
ⲥ stative;
ⲥⲉ stative;
ⲧⲁ stative;
ⲧⲉ stative;
ⲧⲉⲧⲉⲓ:ⲧⲉⲧⲓ stative;
ⲧⲉⲧⲛ stative;
ⲧⲛ stative;
ϥ na;
ϯ na;
ⲕ na;
ⲛⲧⲁ na;
ⲛⲧⲉⲣⲉⲓ:ⲛⲧⲉⲣⲓ na;
ⲡⲉϯ:ⲡⲉⲧⲓ na;
ⲥ na;
ⲥⲉ na;
ⲧⲁ na;
ⲧⲉ na;
ⲧⲉⲧⲉⲓ:ⲧⲉⲧⲓ na;
ⲧⲉⲧⲛ na;
ⲧⲛ na;

LEXICON caus

ⲧⲣ:ⲧⲣⲉ tri_subj;
ⲧⲣⲉ tri_subj;

LEXICON circum1

ⲉ tri_subj;

LEXICON circum2

ϣⲁⲛ verb;
ⲉ verb;

LEXICON conv

ⲉⲣⲉ pet;
ⲉⲧⲉⲣⲉ pet;
ⲛⲉⲣⲉ pet;
ⲉⲣⲉ art_pl_long;
ⲉⲧⲉⲣⲉ art_pl_long;
ⲛⲉⲣⲉ art_pl_long;
ⲉⲣⲉ art_m;
ⲉⲧⲉⲣⲉ art_m;
ⲛⲉⲣⲉ art_m;
ⲉⲣⲉ penta;
ⲉⲧⲉⲣⲉ penta;
ⲛⲉⲣⲉ penta;
ⲉⲣⲉ art_pl;
ⲉⲧⲉⲣⲉ art_pl;
ⲛⲉⲣⲉ art_pl;
ⲉⲣⲉ art_m_long;
ⲉⲧⲉⲣⲉ art_m_long;
ⲛⲉⲣⲉ art_m_long;
ⲉⲣⲉ art_f;
ⲉⲧⲉⲣⲉ art_f;
ⲛⲉⲣⲉ art_f;
ⲉⲣⲉ art_f_long;
ⲉⲧⲉⲣⲉ art_f_long;
ⲛⲉⲣⲉ art_f_long;
ⲉⲣⲉ nf;
ⲉⲧⲉⲣⲉ nf;
ⲛⲉⲣⲉ nf;

LEXICON conv_short

ⲉ tri_subj;
ⲛⲉ tri_subj;
ⲉ tri_nom;
ⲛⲉ tri_nom;
ⲉ tri_aux;
ⲛⲉ tri_aux;

LEXICON digits

ϣⲙⲟⲩⲛ #;
ϣⲙⲟⲩⲛⲉ #;
ϣⲟⲙⲛⲧ #;
ϣⲟⲙⲧⲉ #;
ϥⲧⲟ #;
ϥⲧⲟⲉ:ϥⲧⲟ #;
ϥⲧⲟⲟⲩ #;
ϯⲉ #;
ϯⲟⲩ #;
ⲟⲩⲁ #;
ⲟⲩⲉⲓ #;
ⲥϣϥ:ⲥⲁϣϥ #;
ⲥϣϥⲉ:ⲥⲁϣϥⲉ #;
ⲥⲁϣϥ #;
ⲥⲁϣϥⲉ #;
ⲥⲛⲁⲩ #;
ⲥⲛⲧⲉ #;
ⲥⲟⲉ #;
ⲥⲟⲟⲩ #;
ⲯⲓⲥ #;
ⲯⲓⲧⲉ #;

LEXICON et

ⲉⲧ verb;
ⲉⲧ tri_subj;
ⲉⲧ stative;

LEXICON hundred

ϣⲉ #;
ϣⲏⲧ #;
ϣⲙⲛⲧϣⲉ #;
ϥⲧⲉⲩϣⲉ #;
ϣⲉ digits;
ϣⲏⲧ digits;
ϣⲙⲛⲧϣⲉ digits;
ϥⲧⲉⲩϣⲉ digits;
ϣⲉ tens;
ϣⲏⲧ tens;
ϣⲙⲛⲧϣⲉ tens;
ϥⲧⲉⲩϣⲉ tens;
ϣⲉ tenprefix;
ϣⲏⲧ tenprefix;
ϣⲙⲛⲧϣⲉ tenprefix;
ϥⲧⲉⲩϣⲉ tenprefix;

LEXICON inf_mark

ⲉ verb;
ⲙⲛⲛⲥⲁ verb;
ⲉ caus;
ⲙⲛⲛⲥⲁ caus;

LEXICON je

ϫⲉ art_m;
ϫⲉ conv;
ϫⲉ art_pl;
ϫⲉ art_theta;
ϫⲉ tri_nom;
ϫⲉ art_phi;
ϫⲉ bi_subj;
ϫⲉ art_f;
ϫⲉ name;
ϫⲉ circum1;
ϫⲉ tri_aux;

LEXICON labial_penta

ⲡⲉⲛⲧⲁ verb;
ⲡⲉⲛⲧⲁ tri_subj;

LEXICON labial_pet

ⲡⲉϯ:ⲡⲉⲧⲓ verb;
ⲡⲉⲧ verb;
ⲡⲉϯ:ⲡⲉⲧⲓ tri_subj;
ⲡⲉⲧ tri_subj;
ⲡⲉϯ:ⲡⲉⲧⲓ stative;
ⲡⲉⲧ stative;

LEXICON large_counter

ϣⲙⲟⲩⲛ hundred;
ϥⲧⲟⲟⲩ hundred;
ϥⲧⲟⲩ:ϥⲧⲟⲟⲩ hundred;
ϯⲉ hundred;
ϯⲟⲩ hundred;
ⲥⲁϣϥ hundred;
ⲥⲟⲟⲩ hundred;
ⲯⲓⲥ hundred;
ϣⲙⲟⲩⲛ thousand;
ϥⲧⲟⲟⲩ thousand;
ϥⲧⲟⲩ:ϥⲧⲟⲟⲩ thousand;
ϯⲉ thousand;
ϯⲟⲩ thousand;
ⲥⲁϣϥ thousand;
ⲥⲟⲟⲩ thousand;
ⲯⲓⲥ thousand;

LEXICON m

ⲙ labial_pet;
ⲙ labial_penta;
ⲙ labial_noun_m;
ⲙ labial_noun_f;

LEXICON mmau

ϩⲓϩⲟⲩⲛ #;
ⲙⲙⲁⲩ #;
ⲛϩⲟⲩⲟ #;

LEXICON n

ⲛ noun_f;
ⲛ noun_m;

LEXICON na

ⲛⲁ verb;

LEXICON nf

ⲛϥ:ⲛⲉϥ noun_not_verb;

LEXICON penta

ⲛⲉⲛⲧⲁ verb;
ⲡⲉⲛⲧⲁ verb;
ⲧⲉⲛⲧⲁ verb;
ⲛⲉⲛⲧⲁ tri_subj;
ⲡⲉⲛⲧⲁ tri_subj;
ⲧⲉⲛⲧⲁ tri_subj;

LEXICON pet

ⲛⲉϯ:ⲛⲉⲧⲓ tri_subj;
ⲛⲉⲧ tri_subj;
ⲡⲉϯ:ⲡⲉⲧⲓ tri_subj;
ⲡⲉⲧ tri_subj;
ⲧⲉϯ:ⲧⲉⲧⲓ tri_subj;
ⲧⲉⲧ tri_subj;
ⲛⲉϯ:ⲛⲉⲧⲓ mmau;
ⲛⲉⲧ mmau;
ⲡⲉϯ:ⲡⲉⲧⲓ mmau;
ⲡⲉⲧ mmau;
ⲧⲉϯ:ⲧⲉⲧⲓ mmau;
ⲧⲉⲧ mmau;
ⲛⲉϯ:ⲛⲉⲧⲓ verb;
ⲛⲉⲧ verb;
ⲡⲉϯ:ⲡⲉⲧⲓ verb;
ⲡⲉⲧ verb;
ⲧⲉϯ:ⲧⲉⲧⲓ verb;
ⲧⲉⲧ verb;
ⲛⲉϯ:ⲛⲉⲧⲓ stative;
ⲛⲉⲧ stative;
ⲡⲉϯ:ⲡⲉⲧⲓ stative;
ⲡⲉⲧ stative;
ⲧⲉϯ:ⲧⲉⲧⲓ stative;
ⲧⲉⲧ stative;
ⲛⲉϯ:ⲛⲉⲧⲓ na;
ⲛⲉⲧ na;
ⲡⲉϯ:ⲡⲉⲧⲓ na;
ⲡⲉⲧ na;
ⲧⲉϯ:ⲧⲉⲧⲓ na;
ⲧⲉⲧ na;

LEXICON ppero

ϥ #;
ⲓ #;
ⲕ #;
ⲛ #;
ⲟⲩ #;
ⲥ #;
ⲧ #;
ⲧⲉⲧⲛ #;
ⲩ #;

LEXICON pre_nom_verb

ϫⲓ art_pl;
ϯ art_pl;
ⲣ art_pl;
ϫⲓ art_m;
ϯ art_m;
ⲣ art_m;
ϫⲓ art_f;
ϯ art_f;
ⲣ art_f;

LEXICON prep_m

ϩⲁⲧⲙ art_m;
ϩⲓϫⲙ art_m;
ϩⲓⲣⲙ art_m;
ϩⲓⲧⲙ art_m;
ϩⲙ art_m;
ⲉϫⲙ art_m;
ⲙ art_m;
ϩⲁⲧⲙ art_m_long;
ϩⲓϫⲙ art_m_long;
ϩⲓⲣⲙ art_m_long;
ϩⲓⲧⲙ art_m_long;
ϩⲙ art_m_long;
ⲉϫⲙ art_m_long;
ⲙ art_m_long;

LEXICON prep_no_tn

ϩⲓ art_f_no_tn;

LEXICON ta

ⲧⲁ verb;

LEXICON tenprefix

ϣϥⲉ tenterminal;
ϩⲙⲉ tenterminal;
ϩⲙⲉⲛⲉ tenterminal;
ϩⲙⲉⲛⲉⲧ tenterminal;
ϩⲙⲉⲧ tenterminal;
ϫⲟⲩⲧ tenterminal;
ⲙⲁⲃ tenterminal;
ⲙⲛⲧ tenterminal;
ⲡⲥⲁⲧⲁⲓⲟⲩ tenterminal;
ⲥⲉ tenterminal;
ⲧⲁⲉⲓⲟⲩ tenterminal;

LEXICON tens

ϣϥⲉ #;
ϩⲙⲉ #;
ϩⲙⲉⲛⲉ #;
ϫⲟⲩⲱⲧ #;
ϫⲟⲩⲱⲧⲉ #;
ⲙⲁⲁⲃ #;
ⲙⲁⲁⲃⲉ #;
ⲙⲁⲁⲙ:ⲙⲁⲁⲃ #;
ⲙⲏⲧ #;
ⲙⲏⲧⲉ #;
ⲡⲥⲧⲁⲓⲟⲩ #;
ⲥⲉ #;
ⲧⲁⲉⲓⲟⲩ #;

LEXICON tenterminal

ϣⲙⲏⲛ #;
ϣⲙⲏⲛⲉ #;
ϣⲟⲙⲧⲉ #;
ⲁϥⲧⲉ #;
ⲁⲥⲉ #;
ⲟⲩⲉ #;
ⲟⲩⲉⲓ #;
ⲥⲁϣϥⲉ #;
ⲥⲛⲟⲟⲩⲥ #;
ⲥⲛⲟⲟⲩⲥⲉ #;
ⲧⲏ #;
ⲯⲓⲥ #;
ⲯⲓⲧⲉ #;

LEXICON thousand

ϣⲙⲛⲧϣⲟ #;
ϣⲟ #;

LEXICON tri_aux

ϣⲁ tri_subj;
ⲁ tri_subj;
ⲙⲉ tri_subj;
ⲙⲡ tri_subj;

LEXICON tri_nom

ϣⲁⲛⲧⲉ art_pl;
ϣⲁⲣⲉ art_pl;
ⲁ art_pl;
ⲉⲣϣⲁⲛ art_pl;
ⲙⲉⲣⲉ art_pl;
ⲙⲛ art_pl;
ⲙⲡⲉ art_pl;
ⲟⲩⲛ art_pl;
ⲣϣⲁⲛ:ⲉⲣϣⲁⲛ art_pl;
ⲩⲛ art_pl;
ϣⲁⲛⲧⲉ art_m;
ϣⲁⲣⲉ art_m;
ⲁ art_m;
ⲉⲣϣⲁⲛ art_m;
ⲙⲉⲣⲉ art_m;
ⲙⲛ art_m;
ⲙⲡⲉ art_m;
ⲟⲩⲛ art_m;
ⲣϣⲁⲛ:ⲉⲣϣⲁⲛ art_m;
ⲩⲛ art_m;
ϣⲁⲛⲧⲉ art_f;
ϣⲁⲣⲉ art_f;
ⲁ art_f;
ⲉⲣϣⲁⲛ art_f;
ⲙⲉⲣⲉ art_f;
ⲙⲛ art_f;
ⲙⲡⲉ art_f;
ⲟⲩⲛ art_f;
ⲣϣⲁⲛ:ⲉⲣϣⲁⲛ art_f;
ⲩⲛ art_f;

LEXICON tri_subj

ϥ verb;
ⲓ verb;
ⲕ verb;
ⲛ verb;
ⲟⲩ verb;
ⲥ verb;
ⲧⲉⲧⲛ verb;
ⲩ verb;
ϥ stative;
ⲓ stative;
ⲕ stative;
ⲛ stative;
ⲟⲩ stative;
ⲥ stative;
ⲧⲉⲧⲛ stative;
ⲩ stative;
ϥ pre_nom_verb;
ⲓ pre_nom_verb;
ⲕ pre_nom_verb;
ⲛ pre_nom_verb;
ⲟⲩ pre_nom_verb;
ⲥ pre_nom_verb;
ⲧⲉⲧⲛ pre_nom_verb;
ⲩ pre_nom_verb;
ϥ circum2;
ⲓ circum2;
ⲕ circum2;
ⲛ circum2;
ⲟⲩ circum2;
ⲥ circum2;
ⲧⲉⲧⲛ circum2;
ⲩ circum2;
ϥ caus;
ⲓ caus;
ⲕ caus;
ⲛ caus;
ⲟⲩ caus;
ⲥ caus;
ⲧⲉⲧⲛ caus;
ⲩ caus;
ϥ na;
ⲓ na;
ⲕ na;
ⲛ na;
ⲟⲩ na;
ⲥ na;
ⲧⲉⲧⲛ na;
ⲩ na;

LEXICON prep
ϣⲉ art_pl_long;
ϩⲁ art_pl_long;
ϩⲁⲧⲛ art_pl_long;
ϩⲓϫⲛ art_pl_long;
ϩⲓⲣⲛ art_pl_long;
ϩⲓⲧⲛ art_pl_long;
ϩⲛ art_pl_long;
ⲁϫⲛ art_pl_long;
ⲉ art_pl_long;
ⲉϫⲛ art_pl_long;
ⲉⲣⲁⲧ art_pl_long;
ⲉⲧⲃⲉ art_pl_long;
ⲕⲁⲧⲁ art_pl_long;
ⲙⲛ art_pl_long;
ⲛϭⲓ art_pl_long;
ⲛⲃⲗ art_pl_long;
ⲛⲧⲉ art_pl_long;
ⲭⲱⲣⲓⲥ art_pl_long;
ϣⲉ tenprefix;
ϩⲁ tenprefix;
ϩⲁⲧⲛ tenprefix;
ϩⲓϫⲛ tenprefix;
ϩⲓⲣⲛ tenprefix;
ϩⲓⲧⲛ tenprefix;
ϩⲛ tenprefix;
ⲁϫⲛ tenprefix;
ⲉ tenprefix;
ⲉϫⲛ tenprefix;
ⲉⲣⲁⲧ tenprefix;
ⲉⲧⲃⲉ tenprefix;
ⲙⲛ tenprefix;
ⲛϭⲓ tenprefix;
ⲛⲃⲗ tenprefix;
ⲛⲧⲉ tenprefix;
ⲭⲱⲣⲓⲥ tenprefix;
ϣⲉ hundred;
ϩⲁ hundred;
ϩⲁⲧⲛ hundred;
ϩⲓϫⲛ hundred;
ϩⲓⲣⲛ hundred;
ϩⲓⲧⲛ hundred;
ϩⲛ hundred;
ⲁϫⲛ hundred;
ⲉ hundred;
ⲉϫⲛ hundred;
ⲉⲣⲁⲧ hundred;
ⲉⲧⲃⲉ hundred;
ⲕⲁⲧⲁ hundred;
ⲙⲛ hundred;
ⲛϭⲓ hundred;
ⲛⲃⲗ hundred;
ⲛⲧⲉ hundred;
ⲭⲱⲣⲓⲥ hundred;
ϣⲉ nf;
ϩⲁ nf;
ϩⲁⲧⲛ nf;
ϩⲓϫⲛ nf;
ϩⲓⲣⲛ nf;
ϩⲓⲧⲛ nf;
ϩⲛ nf;
ⲁϫⲛ nf;
ⲉ nf;
ⲉϫⲛ nf;
ⲉⲣⲁⲧ nf;
ⲉⲧⲃⲉ nf;
ⲕⲁⲧⲁ nf;
ⲙⲛ nf;
ⲛϭⲓ nf;
ⲛⲃⲗ nf;
ⲛⲧⲉ nf;
ⲭⲱⲣⲓⲥ nf;
ϣⲉ pet;
ϩⲁ pet;
ϩⲁⲧⲛ pet;
ϩⲓϫⲛ pet;
ϩⲓⲣⲛ pet;
ϩⲓⲧⲛ pet;
ϩⲛ pet;
ⲁϫⲛ pet;
ⲉ pet;
ⲉϫⲛ pet;
ⲉⲣⲁⲧ pet;
ⲉⲧⲃⲉ pet;
ⲙⲛ pet;
ⲛϭⲓ pet;
ⲛⲃⲗ pet;
ⲛⲧⲉ pet;
ⲭⲱⲣⲓⲥ pet;
ϣⲉ art_m;
ϩⲁ art_m;
ϩⲁⲧⲛ art_m;
ϩⲓϫⲛ art_m;
ϩⲓⲣⲛ art_m;
ϩⲓⲧⲛ art_m;
ϩⲛ art_m;
ⲁϫⲛ art_m;
ⲉ art_m;
ⲉϫⲛ art_m;
ⲉⲣⲁⲧ art_m;
ⲉⲧⲃⲉ art_m;
ⲕⲁⲧⲁ art_m;
ⲙⲛ art_m;
ⲛϭⲓ art_m;
ⲛⲃⲗ art_m;
ⲛⲧⲉ art_m;
ⲭⲱⲣⲓⲥ art_m;
ϣⲉ tens;
ϩⲁ tens;
ϩⲁⲧⲛ tens;
ϩⲓϫⲛ tens;
ϩⲓⲣⲛ tens;
ϩⲓⲧⲛ tens;
ϩⲛ tens;
ⲁϫⲛ tens;
ⲉ tens;
ⲉϫⲛ tens;
ⲉⲣⲁⲧ tens;
ⲉⲧⲃⲉ tens;
ⲙⲛ tens;
ⲛϭⲓ tens;
ⲛⲃⲗ tens;
ⲛⲧⲉ tens;
ⲭⲱⲣⲓⲥ tens;
ϣⲉ penta;
ϩⲁ penta;
ϩⲁⲧⲛ penta;
ϩⲓϫⲛ penta;
ϩⲓⲣⲛ penta;
ϩⲓⲧⲛ penta;
ϩⲛ penta;
ⲁϫⲛ penta;
ⲉ penta;
ⲉϫⲛ penta;
ⲉⲣⲁⲧ penta;
ⲉⲧⲃⲉ penta;
ⲕⲁⲧⲁ penta;
ⲙⲛ penta;
ⲛϭⲓ penta;
ⲛⲃⲗ penta;
ⲛⲧⲉ penta;
ⲭⲱⲣⲓⲥ penta;
ϣⲉ art_f_long;
ϩⲁ art_f_long;
ϩⲁⲧⲛ art_f_long;
ϩⲓϫⲛ art_f_long;
ϩⲓⲣⲛ art_f_long;
ϩⲓⲧⲛ art_f_long;
ϩⲛ art_f_long;
ⲁϫⲛ art_f_long;
ⲉ art_f_long;
ⲉϫⲛ art_f_long;
ⲉⲣⲁⲧ art_f_long;
ⲉⲧⲃⲉ art_f_long;
ⲕⲁⲧⲁ art_f_long;
ⲙⲛ art_f_long;
ⲛϭⲓ art_f_long;
ⲛⲃⲗ art_f_long;
ⲛⲧⲉ art_f_long;
ⲭⲱⲣⲓⲥ art_f_long;
ϣⲉ art_pl_l;
ϩⲁ art_pl_l;
ϩⲁⲧⲛ art_pl_l;
ϩⲓϫⲛ art_pl_l;
ϩⲓⲣⲛ art_pl_l;
ϩⲓⲧⲛ art_pl_l;
ϩⲛ art_pl_l;
ⲁϫⲛ art_pl_l;
ⲉ art_pl_l;
ⲉϫⲛ art_pl_l;
ⲉⲣⲁⲧ art_pl_l;
ⲉⲧⲃⲉ art_pl_l;
ⲕⲁⲧⲁ art_pl_l;
ⲙⲛ art_pl_l;
ⲛϭⲓ art_pl_l;
ⲛⲃⲗ art_pl_l;
ⲛⲧⲉ art_pl_l;
ⲭⲱⲣⲓⲥ art_pl_l;
ϣⲉ large_counter;
ϩⲁ large_counter;
ϩⲁⲧⲛ large_counter;
ϩⲓϫⲛ large_counter;
ϩⲓⲣⲛ large_counter;
ϩⲓⲧⲛ large_counter;
ϩⲛ large_counter;
ⲁϫⲛ large_counter;
ⲉ large_counter;
ⲉϫⲛ large_counter;
ⲉⲣⲁⲧ large_counter;
ⲉⲧⲃⲉ large_counter;
ⲕⲁⲧⲁ large_counter;
ⲙⲛ large_counter;
ⲛϭⲓ large_counter;
ⲛⲃⲗ large_counter;
ⲛⲧⲉ large_counter;
ⲭⲱⲣⲓⲥ large_counter;
ϣⲉ art_theta;
ϩⲁ art_theta;
ϩⲁⲧⲛ art_theta;
ϩⲓϫⲛ art_theta;
ϩⲓⲣⲛ art_theta;
ϩⲓⲧⲛ art_theta;
ϩⲛ art_theta;
ⲁϫⲛ art_theta;
ⲉ art_theta;
ⲉϫⲛ art_theta;
ⲉⲣⲁⲧ art_theta;
ⲉⲧⲃⲉ art_theta;
ⲕⲁⲧⲁ art_theta;
ⲙⲛ art_theta;
ⲛϭⲓ art_theta;
ⲛⲃⲗ art_theta;
ⲛⲧⲉ art_theta;
ⲭⲱⲣⲓⲥ art_theta;
ϣⲉ art_phi;
ϩⲁ art_phi;
ϩⲁⲧⲛ art_phi;
ϩⲓϫⲛ art_phi;
ϩⲓⲣⲛ art_phi;
ϩⲓⲧⲛ art_phi;
ϩⲛ art_phi;
ⲁϫⲛ art_phi;
ⲉ art_phi;
ⲉϫⲛ art_phi;
ⲉⲣⲁⲧ art_phi;
ⲉⲧⲃⲉ art_phi;
ⲕⲁⲧⲁ art_phi;
ⲙⲛ art_phi;
ⲛϭⲓ art_phi;
ⲛⲃⲗ art_phi;
ⲛⲧⲉ art_phi;
ⲭⲱⲣⲓⲥ art_phi;
ϣⲉ digits;
ϩⲁ digits;
ϩⲁⲧⲛ digits;
ϩⲓϫⲛ digits;
ϩⲓⲣⲛ digits;
ϩⲓⲧⲛ digits;
ϩⲛ digits;
ⲁϫⲛ digits;
ⲉ digits;
ⲉϫⲛ digits;
ⲉⲣⲁⲧ digits;
ⲉⲧⲃⲉ digits;
ⲕⲁⲧⲁ digits;
ⲙⲛ digits;
ⲛϭⲓ digits;
ⲛⲃⲗ digits;
ⲛⲧⲉ digits;
ⲭⲱⲣⲓⲥ digits;
ϣⲉ thousand;
ϩⲁ thousand;
ϩⲁⲧⲛ thousand;
ϩⲓϫⲛ thousand;
ϩⲓⲣⲛ thousand;
ϩⲓⲧⲛ thousand;
ϩⲛ thousand;
ⲁϫⲛ thousand;
ⲉ thousand;
ⲉϫⲛ thousand;
ⲉⲣⲁⲧ thousand;
ⲉⲧⲃⲉ thousand;
ⲙⲛ thousand;
ⲛϭⲓ thousand;
ⲛⲃⲗ thousand;
ⲛⲧⲉ thousand;
ⲭⲱⲣⲓⲥ thousand;
ϣⲉ art_pl_b;
ϩⲁ art_pl_b;
ϩⲁⲧⲛ art_pl_b;
ϩⲓϫⲛ art_pl_b;
ϩⲓⲣⲛ art_pl_b;
ϩⲓⲧⲛ art_pl_b;
ϩⲛ art_pl_b;
ⲁϫⲛ art_pl_b;
ⲉ art_pl_b;
ⲉϫⲛ art_pl_b;
ⲉⲣⲁⲧ art_pl_b;
ⲉⲧⲃⲉ art_pl_b;
ⲕⲁⲧⲁ art_pl_b;
ⲙⲛ art_pl_b;
ⲛϭⲓ art_pl_b;
ⲛⲃⲗ art_pl_b;
ⲛⲧⲉ art_pl_b;
ⲭⲱⲣⲓⲥ art_pl_b;
ϣⲉ art_pl;
ϩⲁ art_pl;
ϩⲁⲧⲛ art_pl;
ϩⲓϫⲛ art_pl;
ϩⲓⲣⲛ art_pl;
ϩⲓⲧⲛ art_pl;
ϩⲛ art_pl;
ⲁϫⲛ art_pl;
ⲉ art_pl;
ⲉϫⲛ art_pl;
ⲉⲣⲁⲧ art_pl;
ⲉⲧⲃⲉ art_pl;
ⲕⲁⲧⲁ art_pl;
ⲙⲛ art_pl;
ⲛϭⲓ art_pl;
ⲛⲃⲗ art_pl;
ⲛⲧⲉ art_pl;
ⲭⲱⲣⲓⲥ art_pl;
ϣⲉ art_m_long;
ϩⲁ art_m_long;
ϩⲁⲧⲛ art_m_long;
ϩⲓϫⲛ art_m_long;
ϩⲓⲣⲛ art_m_long;
ϩⲓⲧⲛ art_m_long;
ϩⲛ art_m_long;
ⲁϫⲛ art_m_long;
ⲉ art_m_long;
ⲉϫⲛ art_m_long;
ⲉⲣⲁⲧ art_m_long;
ⲉⲧⲃⲉ art_m_long;
ⲕⲁⲧⲁ art_m_long;
ⲙⲛ art_m_long;
ⲛϭⲓ art_m_long;
ⲛⲃⲗ art_m_long;
ⲛⲧⲉ art_m_long;
ⲭⲱⲣⲓⲥ art_m_long;
ϣⲉ art_f;
ϩⲁ art_f;
ϩⲁⲧⲛ art_f;
ϩⲓϫⲛ art_f;
ϩⲓⲣⲛ art_f;
ϩⲓⲧⲛ art_f;
ϩⲛ art_f;
ⲁϫⲛ art_f;
ⲉ art_f;
ⲉϫⲛ art_f;
ⲉⲣⲁⲧ art_f;
ⲉⲧⲃⲉ art_f;
ⲕⲁⲧⲁ art_f;
ⲙⲛ art_f;
ⲛϭⲓ art_f;
ⲛⲃⲗ art_f;
ⲛⲧⲉ art_f;
ⲭⲱⲣⲓⲥ art_f;
ϣⲉ art_pl_r;
ϩⲁ art_pl_r;
ϩⲁⲧⲛ art_pl_r;
ϩⲓϫⲛ art_pl_r;
ϩⲓⲣⲛ art_pl_r;
ϩⲓⲧⲛ art_pl_r;
ϩⲛ art_pl_r;
ⲁϫⲛ art_pl_r;
ⲉ art_pl_r;
ⲉϫⲛ art_pl_r;
ⲉⲣⲁⲧ art_pl_r;
ⲉⲧⲃⲉ art_pl_r;
ⲕⲁⲧⲁ art_pl_r;
ⲙⲛ art_pl_r;
ⲛϭⲓ art_pl_r;
ⲛⲃⲗ art_pl_r;
ⲛⲧⲉ art_pl_r;
ⲭⲱⲣⲓⲥ art_pl_r;
LEXICON v_not_n
ϩⲓⲃⲉ ppero;
ϫⲉⲓⲙⲗⲁϩ ppero;
ϫⲟⲩϫⲟⲩ ppero;
ϯⲕⲛⲛⲉ ppero;
ⲉⲓⲁⲧ ppero;
ⲗⲁⲙⲉⲥ ppero;
ⲡⲉⲣⲉⲓⲕⲁⲕⲉⲓ ppero;
ⲥϩⲟⲩⲱⲣ ppero;
ⲧⲥⲉⲓⲟ ppero;
LEXICON verb
ϩⲟⲡ ppero;
ϫⲱⲗⲉ ppero;
ⲁⲡⲟⲣⲓ ppero;
ⲉⲩⲭⲁⲣⲓⲥⲧⲓ ppero;
ⲛⲁ]:ⲛⲁ ppero;
ⲡⲱⲣⲕ ppero;
ⲥⲙⲛ ppero;
ⲧⲓⲥⲟ:ϯⲥⲟ ppero;
